Utah statutes.
39-6-21.   Military court -- Duties of convening authority.

Under regulations the governor may prescribe, the convening authority of a military court or court of inquiry:

(1)  shall detail or employ qualified court reporters, who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court; and

(2)  may detail or employ interpreters to interpret for the court.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

